Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1710
Collection of taxes; payments; how
indicated on tax lists; county
treasurer; duties.

Whenever any taxes are paid,
the county treasurer shall enter on the tax lists, opposite the description
of real estate or personal property whereon the same was levied, the word
"paid", together with the date of such payment, and the name of the person
paying the same, which entry shall be prima facie evidence of such payment. The county treasurer shall maintain a
record of the total tax assessed and monthly total tax collections.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 152, p. 443;

R.S.1913, § 6481;

C.S.1922, § 6004;

C.S.1929, § 77-1909;

R.S.1943, § 77-1710;

Laws 2002, LB 994, § 22;

Laws 2013, LB29, § 2.